Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 3

Municipal Judges Conference

17-3-301. Creation — Authority — Annual meeting.

There is created the Tennessee municipal judges conference, which shall be the official organization of the municipal judges in this state. The membership of the conference shall consist of all judges of municipal courts in the state. The judges shall annually elect a board of governors for the conference.

The Tennessee municipal judges conference is authorized to adopt and, from time to time, amend rules or bylaws that it deems necessary or prudent for the conduct of its affairs. The rules or bylaws shall provide for membership on the board of governors that the conference considers advisable, for the selection of a time and place within the state for annual meetings of the conference, and for other matters consistent with the general laws of the state that the conference chooses.

The conference shall meet annually for the consideration of any and all matters pertaining to the discharge of the official duties and obligations of its members, to the end that there shall be a more efficient and prompt administration of justice in the municipal courts in this state. The annual meeting shall provide educational seminars or training for the membership in addition to the business sessions.

It is the official duty of each member of the conference to attend the annual meeting unless unable to do so because of physical incapacity.

Each member shall be compensated for the member's reasonable expenses in attending the annual meeting. The expenses shall be paid upon a verified statement of expenses being filed with the administrative office of the courts (AOC) by any member incurring such expenses. Expenses shall be paid by the AOC from funds received pursuant to § 16-18-304(a) for training and continuing education courses for municipal court judges. If the designated account fails to accrue sufficient funds to defray the expenses incurred, the member's municipality is responsible for payment of the expenses.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 4; 2018, ch. 620, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added the last sentence in (c); and rewrote (d)(2) which read: “(2) Each member shall be compensated for the member's actual expenses in attending the annual meeting. The expenses shall be paid upon a verified statement of expenses being filed with the chief administrative officer of the municipality by any member incurring such expenses. Expenses shall be paid upon warrant of the chief administrative officer of the municipality from the general fund of the municipality.”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 620, § 3. April 2, 2018.